Hawaii statutes.
§635-3 Dismissal for want of prosecution.
The court may dismiss any action for want of prosecution after due notice to
the claimants whenever claimants have failed to bring such action to trial
within a period established by rule of court. Prior to dismissal of any action
for want of prosecution, a court shall have adopted, promulgated, and published
a rule or rules of court providing circumstances in which a claimant may seek
relief from the judgment or order and such other safeguards as may be necessary.
[CC 1859, §1162; RL 1925, §2391; RL 1935, §4106; am L 1937, c 117, §1; am L
1939, c 145, §1; am L Sp 1941, c 56, §1; RL 1945, §10104; RL 1955, §231-4; HRS
§635-3; am L 1972, c 89, §2B(a)]

Rules of Court

Dismissal, see HRCP rule 41(b).

Law Journals and Reviews

Remedies to obtain dismissal for want of prosecution
discussed. 3 HBJ, no. 3, at 2 (1965).

Case Notes

Defendant's joining in stipulation to remove a cause from
trial calendar is action of the "defendant to delay or postpone
trial". 45 H. 165, 363 P.2d 968 (1961).

Question as to continued effectiveness of section in view of
HRCP 41(b) raised but not decided. 45 H. 165, 363 P.2d 968 (1961).

Matter of continuance in view of public climate is within
court's discretion. 45 H. 478, 370 P.2d 739 (1962).

Application of six-year provision. 48 H. 152, 397 P.2d 593
(1964); 48 H. 290, 401 P.2d 449 (1965); 48 H. 303, 401 P.2d 456 (1965).

Factors to be considered in the exercise of the discretion to
dismiss. 60 H. 125, 588 P.2d 416 (1978).

Cases prior to adoption of the Hawaii Rules of Civil
Procedure.

Notice of motion, how made. 1 H. 14 (1847).

Rules for postponement of trial laid down. 1 H. 74 (1852).

Granting or refusing continuance at discretion of court. 7
H. 211 (1888); 8 H. 466 (1892); 14 H. 313 (1902); 29 H. 434 (1926); 33 H. 113
(1934); 34 H. 390 (1937).

Affidavit in support of continuance because of absence of
witness should set out facts the witness is expected to prove. 8 H. 466
(1892).

Cited: 24 H. 97, 107 (1917); 33 H. 432, 439 (1935).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next